District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.22

Bylaw amendments requiring member approval.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the board of directors or designated body of a membership corporation that has one or more members at the time shall not adopt or amend a bylaw under:

(1)

Section 29-404.10 providing that some of the members have different rights or obligations than other members with respect to voting, dissolution, transfer of memberships or other matters;

(2)

Section 29-404.13 levying dues, assessments, or fees on some or all of the members;

(3)

Section 29-404.21 relating to the termination or suspension of members;

(4)

Section 29-404.22 authorizing the purchase of memberships;

(5)

Section 29-406.08(a):

(A)

Requiring cause to remove a director; or

(B)

Specifying what constitutes cause to remove a director;

(6)

Section 29-406.08(e) relating to the removal of a director who is designated in a manner other than election or appointment; or

(7)

Section 29-406.12.

(b)

The board of directors or designated body of a membership corporation shall not amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws to vary the application of subsection (a) of this section to the corporation.

(c)

If a nonprofit corporation has more than one class of members, the members of a class shall be entitled to vote as a separate voting group on an amendment to the bylaws that:

(1)

Is described in subsection (a) of this subsection if the amendment would affect the members of that class differently than the members of another class; or

(2)

Has any of the effects described in § 29-408.04.

(d)

If a class of members will be divided into 2 or more classes by an amendment to the bylaws, the amendment shall be approved by a majority of the members of each class that will be created.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-408.20.